Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
661B]

REDRESS
FOR WRONGFUL CONVICTION AND IMPRISONMENT

Section

661B-1 Statement of claim for compensation

661B-2 Presentation of claim

661B-3 Judgment and award

661B-4 Time limitations

661B-5 Right of appeal

661B-6 Waiver of sovereign immunity

661B-7 Exclusive remedy

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next